Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1120.28
Communications system; not to function as news agency; information; privileged; exceptions.

The communications system and the director shall not function as a public information or news agency. Communications transmitted on or through the communications system shall be the privileged information of the sender and receiver; Provided, that this shall not prohibit the sender or receiver from releasing to others or to the public such information; and provided further, that in the event of an emergency, the Governor shall have the power to direct release of such information as he deems in the best interests of the state.

Laws 1967, c. 572, § 14, p. 1885;

R.R.S.1943, § 81-1120.14;

Laws 1975, LB 427, § 19.